Utah statutes.
63B-1-313.   Negotiability of obligations -- Registration.
All obligations of the authority are negotiable instruments within the meaning
of, and for all purposes of Title 70A, Uniform Commercial Code, subject only
to any provisions of those obligations relating to registration.
